South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3574.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 63, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-63-215. A school and school district shall provide written notice of any disciplinary actions taken pursuant to this article and any related written communications in the language spoken by the parent or guardian of the student as stated by the parent when enrolling the student pursuant to Section 59-63-32(A). Such disciplinary actions include, but are not limited to: (1) notice of a student suspension made pursuant to Section 59-63-230; (2) notice of student expulsion proceedings made pursuant to Section 59-63-240(A); and (3) notice that a student has been barred from enrolling pursuant to Section 59-63-217. SECTION 2.      Section 59-63-32(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The school district may require an adult seeking to enroll a child who resides with the adult pursuant to Section 59-63-31(1)(c) to accept responsibility for making educational decisions concerning the child. These educational decisions may include, but not be limited to, receiving notices of discipline pursuant to Sections 59-63-230 and 59-63-240, attending conferences with school staff, and granting permission for athletic activities, field trips, and other activities as required. The districts shall require an adult seeking to enroll a child who resides with the adult to state the preferred language for receiving written communications concerning disciplinary matters from the school district, which the parent may update, by providing written notice to the district of the updated preference. SECTION 3.  Section 59-63-217(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) If the board bars a student from enrolling pursuant to this section, written notice must be provided to the student's parent or legal guardian and the student is entitled to a hearing and all other procedural rights afforded under state law to a student subject to expulsion. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----